Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Primary Elections

120.055.
Procedure for contest of primary.

Any candidate for nomination to office at a primary held under the provisions of KRS

118.015

to

118.035

and

118.105

to

118.255

, or any candidate for nomination to a city office at a primary for which the statutes do not otherwise provide for determining contest elections, for whom a number of votes was cast equal to not less than fifty percent (50%) of the votes cast for the successful candidate for nomination to the office, may contest the right of the successful candidate, and of any other candidate for nomination to the office, to the nomination, by filing a petition in the Circuit Court within ten (10) days from the day of the primary, stating the specific grounds relied upon for the contest, and causing a summons to be issued, returnable in seven (7) days. In the case of candidates for offices for the state at large, the petition shall be filed in the Franklin Circuit Court; in the case of other candidates it shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the county in which the contestee resides. The summons may be personally served on the contestee in any county, or it may be served by leaving a copy at his or her home with a member of his or her family over sixteen (16) years of age, or by posting a copy on the door of his or her residence. The contestee shall file his or her answer within seven (7) days after service of summons. The answer may contain grounds of contest in favor of the contestee and against the contestant, but the grounds shall be specifically set out. Any candidate who would have been qualified to bring a contest action under this section, who is a party to a recount proceeding brought under KRS

120.095

, may, by filing an answer in the recount proceeding within the time allowed by this section for filing grounds of contest, set forth grounds of contest against the petitioner in the recount proceeding. No ground of contest by either party shall be filed or made more definite by amendment after the expiration of the time allowed by this section for filing the original pleading. The contestant may file a reply within five (5) days after answer is filed, which shall complete the pleading, and any affirmative matter in the reply shall be treated as controverted. Upon return of the summons, properly executed, to the office of the circuit clerk of the county in which the action is pending, the clerk shall immediately docket the cause and notify the presiding judge of the court that the contest has been instituted, and the judge shall proceed to a trial of the cause within five (5) days after the issue was joined. In judicial circuits having more than one (1) Circuit Judge, the judge who shall hear the cause shall be determined by lot.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 158; 1976, ch. 62, § 87; 1976, ch. 199, § 3; 1992, ch. 288, § 42, effective July 14, 1992; 2020 ch. 88, § 8, effective July 15, 2020.

120.060.
Congressional
districts. [Repealed.]

120.065.
Evidence
in primary contest — Trial — Judgment.

Each party to a contest instituted
under KRS

120.055

shall be entitled, in the production of evidence to be used
on the trial thereof, to all the remedies allowed in cases at law and in equity.
In trying the contest the court shall hear and determine all questions of
law and fact without the intervention of a jury, and may examine the witnesses
orally or require or permit the parties to take the evidence by depositions.
If the evidence is taken orally either party may require it to be taken by
the official reporter for the court, to be taken and transcribed and paid
for as evidence in other civil actions. The court may require the contestant,
or the person who has the burden of proof under the issue joined, to complete
his proof in not less than fifteen (15) days after service of summons, and
the contestee, or the person not having the burden, to complete his proof
in not less than ten (10) days after filing an answer. Each party may be given
one (1) day additional for producing evidence in rebuttal and no greater time
shall be extended, unless the court is satisfied that the ends of justice
demand it. The court shall, immediately after the evidence is concluded, consider
the contest and determine it. If it appears from an inspection of the whole
record that there has been such fraud, intimidation, bribery or violence in
the conduct of the election that neither contestant nor contestee can be adjudged
to have been fairly nominated, the court may adjudge that there has been no
election, in which event the nomination shall be deemed vacant. The judgment
of the court shall be filed in the office of the Circuit Court clerk.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 159; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 133.

120.070.
Congressional
districts. [Repealed.]

120.071.
Congressional
districts. [Repealed.]

120.075.
Appeal
to Court of Appeals from judgment in primary contest.

Any party may appeal to the Court of Appeals from a judgment entered under KRS

120.065

. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure, except that the notice of appeal shall be filed and a supersedeas bond executed in the Circuit Court, and the record shall be filed in the Court of Appeals, within ten (10) days after the entry of the judgment, or within such other time as the Court of Appeals may, for cause shown, permit. The entire original record shall be filed and no designation of record shall be required.

Upon the filing of the record, the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall immediately deliver it to the chief judge.

The Court of Appeals in its discretion may issue its mandate forthwith after rendering its decision, but it shall be without prejudice to the right of the losing party to file a petition for rehearing or the power of the court to recall the mandate should the petition be sustained.

If the judgment is reversed and the case remanded for trial or further action, the proceedings shall continue in the Circuit Court in like manner as when originally filed, beginning ten (10) days after the filing of the mandate with notice to the adverse party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 160; 1976, ch. 62, § 88; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 134.

120.076.
Construction
of KRS 120.071. [Repealed.]

120.085.
Certification
of result of primary contest — Placement of name on ballots.

In the case of offices for which
certificates of nomination are required to be filed with the Secretary of
State, the result of the final judgment in the contest of a primary election
shall be certified to the Secretary of State; in the case of offices for which
certificates of nomination are required to be filed with the county clerk,
the result shall be certified to the county clerk. The Secretary of State
shall certify to the proper county clerks the names of the candidates awarded
nominations as certified to him by the court, and the county clerk shall place
upon the ballots for the regular election the names of the candidates so certified
to him by the Secretary of State and the names of the candidates awarded nominations
as certified to him by the court, in place of the candidates whose nominations
were successfully contested.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 161.

120.095.
Recount of primary.

Any candidate voted for at a primary held under KRS

118.015

to

118.035

and

118.105

to

118.255

may request a recount of the ballots by filing a petition with the same court that contest petitions are required to be filed with, within ten (10) days after the day of the primary, or, if the candidate is qualified to bring a contest proceeding under KRS

120.055

, by including a request for a recount in his or her petition instituting the contest proceedings. Any candidate who is a contestee in a contest proceeding under KRS

120.055

may request a recount in his or her answer filed in the contest proceeding, but in that case the answer shall be filed within five (5) days after the service of process on the petition. When a request for a recount is made, the State Board of Elections or the county board of elections, whichever would issue the certificate of nomination, shall be made a party defendant. The party requesting the recount shall execute a bond with approved surety for the costs of the recount, in an amount to be fixed by the Circuit Judge. Upon the bond being filed, the clerk shall immediately notify the Circuit Judge of the request and the filing of the bond, and the judge shall at once enter an order directing custody of the voting machines, voting equipment, or voting system, the ballots, boxes, and all papers pertaining to the election to be transferred to the Circuit Court, and fix a day for the recount proceedings to begin. A copy of the order shall be served upon the parties or their counsel in the same manner as notices are required to be served, which shall be deemed sufficient notice of the proceeding. On the day fixed, the court shall proceed to recount the ballots if their integrity is satisfactorily shown and shall complete the recount as soon as practicable, and file and enter of record the results thereof, and direct the state board or county board, whichever would issue the certificate of nomination, to issue a certificate to the party entitled thereto as shown by the recount.

Any party may appeal from the judgment to the Court of Appeals, in the same manner as provided in KRS

120.075

, all of the provisions of which statute shall be applicable.

If a proceeding for recount is asked and prosecuted in a contest proceeding, it shall not await the preparation or trial of the contest in the Circuit Court or in the Court of Appeals. The action of the courts shall be final, concluding the parties as to the question of a recount of the ballots, and certificates shall then be issued to the parties entitled thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 162; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 135, effective January 2, 1978; 1992, ch. 288, § 43, effective July 14, 1992; 2020 ch. 88, § 9, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 67, effective June 29, 2021.

120.110.
Definitions.
[Repealed.]

120.120.
Presidential
preference primary election authorized; when conducted; hours; method of conducting.
[Repealed.]

120.130.
Presidential
preference primary election authorized; when conducted; hours; method of conducting.
[Repealed.]

120.140.
Nomination
of candidates by State Board of Elections. [Repealed.]

120.150.
Nomination
of candidate by petition. [Repealed.]